Hawaii statutes.
[§846-53] Responsibility of
agencies. Agencies that have investigative, detention, custodial,
adjudicative, or program responsibility for adult or juvenile offenses shall
cooperate with the attorney general in establishing the hate crime reporting
system by:

(1) Providing information in the agency files that
can be included pursuant to the format approved by the attorney general;

(2) Maintaining procedures internally consistent with
uniform procedures and guidelines provided by the attorney general;

(3) Reporting information to the attorney general
that is timely, complete, and accurate after the occurrence of an event over
which the agency had direct responsibility; and

(4) Maintaining procedures for the periodic checking
of information to minimize the possibility of storing and maintaining
inaccurate information. [L 2001, c 240, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next